New York, session 2025-2026, A5313.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 806-a of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. Whenever such course of instruction is offered within a district, a 4 child residing within that district but not attending the school at 5 which such course is offered, shall be allowed to participate in such 6 course, provided such child otherwise meets the requirements of such 7 course and pays fees related to such course, if any. 8 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3202-a to 9 read as follows: 10 § 3202-a. Participation of home-schooled students in athletic activ- 11 ities. Whenever a district shall offer an interscholastic athletic 12 activity, a child residing within such district but not attending such 13 school, shall be allowed an opportunity to participate in such athletic 14 activity; provided, that such child is not a pupil at another school 15 within such district. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 17 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09206-01-5